Hawaii, session 2025, SB40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Pursuant to section 201H-88, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may secure a line of credit or other instrument of indebtedness, in an amount not to exceed $300,000,000 during the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, to meet the requirements of federal tax law for the bond volume cap recycling program under section 39B-2(f), Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________